North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-51.1 Oil Extraction Tax

57-51.1-01.
Definitions for oil extraction tax.

For the purposes of this chapter:

“Average daily production” of a well means the qualified maximum total production of oil from the well during a calendar month period divided by the number of calendar days in that period, and “qualified maximum total production” of a well means that the well must have been maintained at the maximum efficient rate of production as defined and determined by rule adopted by the industrial commission in furtherance of its authority under chapter 38-08.

“Horizontal well” means a well with a horizontal displacement of the well bore drilled at an angle of at least eighty degrees within the productive formation of at least three hundred feet [91.44 meters].

“Oil” means petroleum, crude oil, mineral oil, casinghead gasoline, and all liquid hydrocarbons that are recovered from gas on the lease incidental to the production of the gas.

“Property” means the right which arises from a lease or fee interest, as a whole or any designated portion thereof, to produce oil. A producer shall treat as a separate property each separate and distinct producing reservoir subject to the same right to produce crude oil; provided, that such reservoir is recognized by the industrial commission as a producing formation that is separate and distinct from, and not in communication with, any other producing formation.

“Qualifying secondary recovery project” means a project employing water flooding. To be eligible for the tax exemption provided under section 57-51.1-03 , a secondary recovery project must be certified as qualifying by the industrial commission and the project operator must have obtained incremental production as defined in subsection 3 of section 57-51.1-03.

“Qualifying tertiary recovery project” means a project for enhancing recovery of oil which meets the requirements of section 4993(c), Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended through December 31, 1986, and includes the following methods for recovery:

Miscible fluid displacement.

Steam drive injection.

Microemulsion.

In situ combustion.

Polymer augmented water flooding.

Cyclic steam injection.

Alkaline flooding.

Carbonated water flooding.

Immiscible carbon dioxide displacement.

New tertiary recovery methods certified by the industrial commission.

“Royalty owner” means an owner of what is commonly known as the royalty interest and shall not include the owner of any overriding royalty or other payment carved out of the working interest.

“Stripper well” means a well drilled and completed, or re-entered and recompleted as a horizontal well, after June 30, 2013, whose average daily production of oil during any preceding consecutive twelve-month period, excluding condensate recovered in nonassociated production, per well did not exceed ten barrels per day for wells of a depth of six thousand feet [1828.80 meters] or less, fifteen barrels per day for wells of a depth of more than six thousand feet [1828.80 meters] but not more than ten thousand feet [3048 meters], and thirty barrels per day for wells of a depth of more than ten thousand feet [3048 meters] outside the Bakken and Three Forks formations, and thirty-five barrels per day for wells of a depth of more than ten thousand feet [3048 meters] in the Bakken or Three Forks formation.

“Stripper well property” means wells drilled and completed, or a well re-entered and recompleted as a horizontal well, before July 1, 2013, on a “property” whose average daily production of oil, excluding condensate recovered in nonassociated production, per well did not exceed ten barrels per day for wells of a depth of six thousand feet [1828.80 meters] or less, fifteen barrels per day for wells of a depth of more than six thousand feet [1828.80 meters] but not more than ten thousand feet [3048 meters], and thirty barrels per day for wells of a depth of more than ten thousand feet [3048 meters] during any preceding consecutive twelve-month period. Wells which did not actually yield or produce oil during the qualifying twelve-month period, including disposal wells, dry wells, spent wells, and shut-in wells, are not production wells for the purpose of determining whether the stripper well property exemption applies.

It does not include water flooding, unless the water flooding is used as an element of one of the qualifying tertiary recovery techniques described in this subsection, or immiscible natural gas injection. To be eligible for the tax exemption provided under section 57-51.1-03 , a tertiary recovery project must be certified as qualifying by the industrial commission, the project operator must continue to operate the unit as a qualifying tertiary recovery project, and the project operator must have obtained incremental production as defined in subsection 3 of section 57-51.1-03.

Source:

I.M. approved November 4, 1980, S.L. 1981, ch. 649, § 4; 1981, ch. 612, § 2; 1983, ch. 662, § 1; 1987, ch. 724, § 2; 1991, ch. 690, § 2; 1991, ch. 691, § 1; 1995, ch. 577, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 549, § 5; 2001, ch. 550, § 1; 2003, ch. 543, § 2; 2013, ch. 473, § 4; 2015, ch. 466, § 2, effective January 1, 2016.

57-51.1-02.
Imposition of oil extraction tax.

There is hereby imposed an excise tax, to be known as the “oil extraction tax”, upon the activity in this state of extracting oil from the earth, and every owner, including any royalty owner, of any part of the oil extracted is deemed for the purposes of this chapter to be engaged in the activity of extracting that oil.

The rate of tax is five percent of the gross value at the well of the oil extracted.

However, if the average price of a barrel of crude oil exceeds the trigger price of ninety dollars for each month in any consecutive three-month period, then the rate of tax on oil extracted from all taxable wells is six percent of the gross value at the well of the oil extracted until the average price of a barrel of crude oil is less than the trigger price of ninety dollars for each month in any consecutive three-month period, in which case the rate of tax reverts to five percent of the gross value at the well of the oil extracted. By December thirty-first of each year, the tax commissioner shall determine an indexed trigger price under this section by applying to the current trigger price an adjustment equal to the percentage rate of change of the producer price index for industrial commodities as calculated and published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, for the twelve months ending June thirtieth of that year and the indexed trigger price so determined is the trigger price for the following calendar year.

For purposes of this section, “average price” of a barrel of crude oil means the monthly average of the daily closing price for a barrel of west Texas intermediate cushing crude oil, as those prices appear in the Wall Street Journal, midwest edition. When computing the monthly average price, the most recent previous daily closing price must be considered the daily closing price for the days on which the market is closed.

Source:

I.M. approved November 4, 1980, S.L. 1981, ch. 649, § 2; 1987, ch. 724, § 3; 1991, ch. 690, § 3; 1991, ch. 691, § 2; 1993, ch. 577, § 1; 1995, ch. 578, § 1; 2001, ch. 550, § 2; 2015, ch. 466, § 3, effective January 1, 2016.

57-51.1-02.1.
Temporary exemption for oil and gas wells employing a system to avoid flaring.

Liquids produced from a collection system described in subdivision d of subsection 2 of section 38-08-06.4 utilizing absorption, adsorption, or refrigeration are exempt from the tax under section 57-51.1-02 for a period of two years and thirty days from the time of first production.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 472, § 4.

57-51.1-02.2.
Temporary exemption — Oil extraction tax credit for gas flaring mitigation. [Expired effective July 1, 2023]

As used in this section:

“Flare mitigation” means the quantity in millions of British thermal units of heat content of gas used by an onsite flare mitigation system. The term does not include the heat content of any gas flared before, during, or after intake by a flare mitigation system.

“Onsite flare mitigation system” means a system at a well site which intakes gas and natural gas liquids from a well, separating and collecting or utilizing over fifty percent of the propane and heavier hydrocarbons, to achieve a reduction of flared thermal intensity through beneficial consumption by:

Compressing or liquifying gas for use as fuel or transport to a processing facility;

Production of petrochemicals or fertilizer;

Conversion to liquid fuels;

Conversion to electricity for onsite use or supply to the electrical grid;

Conversion to computational power; or

Other value-added processes as approved by the industrial commission.

“Qualifying well” means a well on which:

If a well site already is connected to a pipeline and pipeline capacity is unavailable on the existing pipeline, the producer and the pipeline operator jointly have filed a sundry with the industrial commission attesting to the lack of existing pipeline takeaway capacity;

If the producer’s well is not connected to an existing pipeline but the producer’s lands, leases, wells, or gas are dedicated contractually to a pipeline operator, the producer and the pipeline operator to which the lands, leases, wells, or gas are dedicated jointly have filed a sundry with the industrial commission attesting it is either technically or commercially unfeasible to connect a pipeline to the producer’s well; or

If the producer’s well is not already connected to an existing pipeline and the producer’s lands, leases, wells, or gas are not dedicated contractually, the producer unilaterally has filed a sundry with the industrial commission attesting to these facts.

A system that otherwise meets the definition of onsite flare mitigation system as defined in this section is not an “onsite flare mitigation system” if it is:

Installed on a stripper well as defined by subsection 8 of section 57-51.1-01;

Installed before July 1, 2021;

Installed on a well connected to or is technically and commercially feasible to connect to a gas pipeline with capacity;

A system that supports the normal production operations of a well, consumes gas as part of the routine oil and gas production process, such as a heater treater, separator, or electrical dissipation through a load bank, or any system or application traditionally considered as on-pad use.

A producer is entitled to a credit against the tax liability determined under chapter 57-51.1 equal to seventy-five cents per one million British thermal units of flare mitigation resulting from the operation of an onsite flare mitigation system on a qualifying well.

The credit may be claimed for up to twelve months per well and may not exceed six thousand dollars per well per month.

To qualify for the credit:

The industrial commission shall certify the well of a producer as a qualifying well and the producer shall submit a copy of the certification to the tax commissioner.

On or before the fifteenth day of the month succeeding the month of production, the owner or operator of the onsite flare mitigation system shall file a monthly report with the tax commissioner and the producer certifying the amount of flare mitigation per qualifying well during the month of production.

The credit for flare mitigation must be claimed by the producer against the oil extraction tax due on a per well basis for the production month following the month in which the mitigation occurred.

The producer shall file the return required under this chapter for the duration of the credit and pay any oil taxes due. After the exemption period ends, the purchaser shall pay the oil taxes due.

The tax commissioner may audit the records of the producer and operator of the onsite flare mitigation system to administer this section. The credit allowed may not exceed the liability of the tax under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 481, § 1, eff August 1, 2021; Expired by 2021, ch. 481, § 3, eff June 30, 2023.

57-51.1-03.
Exemptions from oil extraction tax.

The following activities are specifically exempted from the oil extraction tax:

The activity of extracting from the earth any oil that is exempt from the gross production tax imposed by chapter 57-51.

The activity of extracting from the earth any oil from a stripper well property or individual stripper well.

The incremental production from a secondary recovery project which has been certified as a qualified project by the industrial commission after July 1, 1991, is exempt from any taxes imposed under this chapter for a period of five years from the date the incremental production begins.

The incremental production from a tertiary recovery project which has been certified as a qualified project by the industrial commission is exempt from any taxes imposed under this chapter for a period of ten years from the date the incremental production begins. Incremental production from a tertiary recovery project from a horizontal well drilled and completed within the Bakken and Three Forks formations which has been certified as a qualified project by the industrial commission is not exempt from July 1, 2015, through June 30, 2017, and is thereafter exempt from any taxes imposed under this chapter for a period of five years from July 1, 2017, or the date the incremental production begins, whichever is later.

The incremental production from a tertiary recovery project that injects more than fifty percent carbon dioxide produced from coal and has been certified as a qualified project by the industrial commission is exempt from any taxes imposed under this chapter for a period of twenty years from the date the incremental production begins or from the date the project is certified by the industrial commission as meeting the fifty percent or more carbon dioxide produced from coal injection requirement, whichever is later. To qualify for the exemption under this subsection, the project must be located outside the Bakken or Three Forks formations and must use carbon dioxide produced from coal. The incremental production that has been certified by the industrial commission under this section must be used to calculate the exemption under this subdivision.

The incremental production from a tertiary recovery project that injects more than fifty percent carbon dioxide produced from coal and has been certified as a qualified project by the industrial commission is exempt from any taxes imposed under this chapter for a period of ten years from the date the incremental production begins or from the date the project is certified by the industrial commission as meeting the fifty percent or more carbon dioxide produced from coal injection requirement, whichever is later. To qualify for the exemption under this subsection, the project must be located within the Bakken or Three Forks formations and must use carbon dioxide produced from coal. The incremental production that has been certified by the industrial commission under this section must be used to calculate the exemption under this subdivision.

For purposes of this subsection, incremental production is defined in the following manner:

For purposes of determining the exemption provided for in subdivision a and with respect to a unit where there has not been a secondary recovery project, incremental production means the difference between the total amount of oil produced from the unit during the secondary recovery project and the amount of primary production from the unit. For purposes of this paragraph, primary production means the amount of oil which would have been produced from the unit if the secondary recovery project had not been commenced. The industrial commission shall determine the amount of primary production in a manner which conforms to the practice and procedure used by the commission at the time the project is certified.

For purposes of determining the exemption provided for in subdivision a and with respect to a unit where a secondary recovery project was in existence prior to July 1, 1991, and where the industrial commission cannot establish an accurate production decline curve, incremental production means the difference between the total amount of oil produced from the unit during a new secondary recovery project and the amount of production which would be equivalent to the average monthly production from the unit during the most recent twelve months of normal production reduced by a production decline rate of ten percent for each year. The industrial commission shall determine the average monthly production from the unit during the most recent twelve months of normal production and must upon request or upon its own motion hold a hearing to make this determination. For purposes of this paragraph, when determining the most recent twelve months of normal production the industrial commission is not required to use twelve consecutive months. In addition, the production decline rate of ten percent must be applied from the last month in the twelve-month period of time.

For purposes of determining the exemption provided for in subdivision a and with respect to a unit where a secondary recovery project was in existence before July 1, 1991, and where the industrial commission can establish an accurate production decline curve, incremental production means the difference between the total amount of oil produced from the unit during the new secondary recovery project and the total amount of oil that would have been produced from the unit if the new secondary recovery project had not been commenced. For purposes of this paragraph, the total amount of oil that would have been produced from the unit if the new secondary recovery project had not been commenced includes both primary production and production that occurred as a result of the secondary recovery project that was in existence before July 1, 1991. The industrial commission shall determine the amount of oil that would have been produced from the unit if the new secondary recovery project had not been commenced in a manner that conforms to the practice and procedure used by the commission at the time the new secondary recovery project is certified.

For purposes of determining the exemption provided for in subdivision b and with respect to a unit where there has not been a secondary recovery project, incremental production means the difference between the total amount of oil produced from the unit during the tertiary recovery project and the amount of primary production from the unit. For purposes of this paragraph, primary production means the amount of oil which would have been produced from the unit if the tertiary recovery project had not been commenced. The industrial commission shall determine the amount of primary production in a manner which conforms to the practice and procedure used by the commission at the time the project is certified.

For purposes of determining the exemption provided for in subdivision b and with respect to a unit where there is or has been a secondary recovery project, incremental production means the difference between the total amount of oil produced during the tertiary recovery project and the amount of production which would be equivalent to the average monthly production from the unit during the most recent twelve months of normal production reduced by a production decline rate of ten percent for each year. The industrial commission shall determine the average monthly production from the unit during the most recent twelve months of normal production and must upon request or upon its own motion hold a hearing to make this determination. For purposes of this paragraph, when determining the most recent twelve months of normal production the industrial commission is not required to use twelve consecutive months. In addition, the production decline rate of ten percent must be applied from the last month in the twelve-month period of time.

For purposes of determining the exemption provided for in subdivision b and with respect to a unit where there is or has been a secondary recovery project and where the industrial commission can establish an accurate production decline curve, incremental production means the difference between the total amount of oil produced from the unit during the tertiary recovery project and the total amount of oil that would have been produced from the unit if the tertiary recovery project had not been commenced. For purposes of this paragraph, the total amount of oil that would have been produced from the unit if the tertiary recovery project had not been commenced includes both primary production and production that occurred as a result of any secondary recovery project. The industrial commission shall determine the amount of oil that would have been produced from the unit if the tertiary recovery project had not been commenced in a manner that conforms to the practice and procedure used by the commission at the time the tertiary recovery project is certified.

For purposes of determining the exemption provided for in subdivisions c and d, and with respect to a unit where a tertiary recovery project was in existence, and where the industrial commission cannot establish an accurate production decline curve, incremental production means the difference between the total amount of oil produced from the unit during a new tertiary recovery project and the amount of production which would be equivalent to the average monthly production from the unit during the most recent twelve months of normal production reduced by a production decline rate of ten percent for each year. The industrial commission shall determine the average monthly production from the unit during the most recent twelve months of normal production and shall upon request or upon its own motion hold a hearing to make this determination. For purposes of this paragraph, in determining the most recent twelve months of normal production the industrial commission is not required to use twelve consecutive months. In addition, the production decline rate of ten percent must be applied from the last month in the twelve-month period of time.

For purposes of determining the exemption provided for in subdivisions c and d, and with respect to a unit where a tertiary recovery project was in existence, and where the industrial commission can establish an accurate production decline curve, incremental production means the difference between the total amount of oil produced from the unit during the new tertiary recovery project and the total amount of oil that would have been produced from the unit if the new tertiary recovery project had not been commenced. For purposes of this paragraph, the total amount of oil that would have been produced from the unit if the new tertiary recovery project had not been commenced includes both primary production and production that occurred as a result of the tertiary recovery project that was previously in existence. The industrial commission shall determine the amount of oil that would have been produced from the unit if the new tertiary recovery project had not been commenced in a manner that conforms to the practice and procedure used by the commission at the time the new tertiary recovery project is certified.

The industrial commission shall adopt rules relating to this exemption which must include procedures for determining incremental production as defined in subdivision e.

The first seventy-five thousand barrels of oil produced during the first eighteen months after completion, from a well drilled and completed outside the Bakken and Three Forks formations, and ten miles [16.10 kilometers] or more outside an established field in which the industrial commission has defined the pool to include the Bakken or Three Forks formation, is subject to a reduced tax rate of two percent of the gross value at the well of the oil extracted under this chapter.

Source:

I.M. approved November 4, 1980, S.L. 1981, ch. 649, § 3; 1981, ch. 612, § 1; 1987, ch. 724, § 4; 1987, ch. 725, § 1; 1989, ch. 734, § 1; 1991, ch. 690, § 4; 1991, ch. 691, § 3; 1993, ch. 577, § 2; 1995, ch. 577, §§ 3, 4; 1995, ch. 579, § 1; 1997, ch. 504, § 1; 2001, ch. 549, § 6; 2001, ch. 550, § 3; 2003, ch. 543, § 3; 2007, ch. 544, § 1; 2009, ch. 576, § 1; 2009, ch. 577, § 1; 2011, ch. 482, § 1; 2013, ch. 473, § 5; 2015, ch. 49, § 32, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014; 2015, ch. 466, §§ 4, 5, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014; 2019, ch. 478, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

57-51.1-03.1.
Stripper well, new well, and secondary or tertiary project certification for tax exemption or rate reduction — Filing requirement.

To receive the benefits of a tax exemption or tax rate reduction, a certification of qualifying well status prepared by the industrial commission must be submitted to the tax commissioner as follows:

To receive, from the first day of eligibility, a tax exemption on production from a stripper well property or individual stripper well under subsection 2 of section 57-51.1-03, the industrial commission’s certification must be submitted to the tax commissioner within eighteen months after the end of the stripper well property’s or stripper well’s qualification period.

To receive, from the first day of eligibility, a tax exemption under subsection 3 of section 57-51.1-03 on production from a secondary or tertiary project, the industrial commission’s certification must be submitted to the tax commissioner within eighteen months after the month in which the first incremental oil was produced.

To receive, from the first day of eligibility, a tax exemption or the reduction on production for which any other tax exemption or rate reduction may apply, the industrial commission’s certification must be submitted to the tax commissioner within eighteen months of the completion, recompletion, or other qualifying date.

If the industrial commission’s certification is not submitted to the tax commissioner within the eighteen-month period provided in this section, then the exemption or rate reduction does not apply for the production periods in which the certification is not on file with the tax commissioner. When the industrial commission’s certification is submitted to the tax commissioner after the eighteen-month period, the tax exemption or rate reduction applies to prospective production periods only and the exemption or rate reduction is effective the first day of the month in which the certification is received by the tax commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 580, § 1; 2003, ch. 543, § 1; 2013, ch. 473, § 6; 2017, ch. 57, § 18, eff for taxable events occurring after December 31, 2015.

57-51.1-04.
Authority of tax commissioner to accept production reports computed on a property basis. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 732, § 5.

57-51.1-05.
Administration of oil extraction tax.

For the purposes of administering the tax imposed by section 57-51.1-02, the provisions of chapter 57-51 pertaining to the administration of the oil and gas gross production tax law not in conflict with the provisions of this chapter, including but not limited to the provisions of that chapter relating to the filing of returns, deduction of the tax by the purchaser or producer in making settlement with any owner of the oil, payment of the tax and interest and penalties thereon, refunds, attachment of liens for failure to pay the tax, and civil and criminal penalties for failure to comply with the provisions of that chapter, govern the administration of the tax imposed by section 57-51.1-02.

Source:

I.M. approved November 4, 1980, S.L. 1981, ch. 649, § 5; 1983, ch. 82, § 144.

57-51.1-06.
Oil extraction tax development fund established.

The tax imposed by section 57-51.1-02 must be paid to the state treasurer when collected by the state tax commissioner and must be credited to a special fund in the state treasury, to be known as the oil extraction tax development fund. The moneys accumulated in such fund must be allocated as provided in this chapter and the legislative assembly shall make any appropriation of money that may be necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter. For purposes of distributions and allocations made by the state treasurer under this chapter and chapters 57-51 and 57-51.2, all revenue collected by the commissioner under this chapter must be considered revenue collections for the period in which the revenue was received by the commissioner.

Source:

I.M. approved November 4, 1980, S.L. 1981, ch. 649, § 6; 2015, ch. 464, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

57-51.1-07.
Allocation of moneys in oil extraction tax development fund.

Moneys deposited in the oil extraction tax development fund from revenue collected under section 57-51.1-02 and oil extraction tax revenue allocated to the state under the terms of an agreement entered pursuant to chapter 57-51.2 must be transferred monthly by the state treasurer as follows:

Twenty percent must be allocated to the sinking fund established for payment of the state of North Dakota water development bonds, southwest pipeline series, and any moneys in excess of the sum necessary to maintain the accounts within the sinking fund and for the payment of principal and interest on the bonds must be credited to a special trust fund, to be known as the resources trust fund. The resources trust fund must be established in the state treasury and the funds therein must be deposited and invested as are other state funds to earn the maximum amount permitted by law which income must be deposited in the resources trust fund. Three percent of the amount credited to the resources trust fund must be transferred no less than quarterly into the renewable energy development fund, not to exceed three million dollars per biennium. One-half of one percent of the amount credited to the resources trust fund must be transferred no less than quarterly into the energy conservation grant fund not to exceed one million two hundred thousand dollars per biennium. The principal and income of the resources trust fund may be expended only pursuant to legislative appropriation and are available to:

The state water commission for planning for and construction of water-related projects, including rural water systems. These water-related projects must be those which the state water commission has the authority to undertake and construct pursuant to chapter 61-02; and

The industrial commission for the funding of programs for development of renewable energy sources; for studies for development of cogeneration systems that increase the capacity of a system to produce more than one kind of energy from the same fuel; for studies for development of waste products utilization; and for the making of grants and loans in connection therewith.

The department of commerce for the funding of programs for development of energy conservation and for the making of grants and loans relating to energy conservation.

One-half of one percent must be allocated to the resources trust fund beginning with allocations made by the state treasurer in August 2019 and continuing until the combined allocations under this subsection total one hundred twenty-eight million seven hundred forty thousand dollars, after which the state treasurer shall discontinue making allocations under this subsection.

Twenty percent must be allocated to the common schools trust fund and foundation aid stabilization fund as provided in section 24 of article X of the Constitution of North Dakota.

Thirty percent must be allocated to the legacy fund as provided in section 26 of article X of the Constitution of North Dakota.

The remainder must be allocated to the state’s general fund.

Source:

I.M. approved November 4, 1980, S.L. 1981, ch. 649, § 7; 1981, ch. 2, § 5; 1981, ch. 198, § 2; 1981, ch. 613, § 2; 1983, ch. 663, § 1; 1983, ch. 686, § 11; 1985, ch. 651, § 1; 1995, ch. 47, § 8; 1995, ch. 581, § 1; 1997, ch. 25, § 12; 2009, ch. 578, § 1; 2011, ch. 484, § 2; 2013, ch. 45, § 29; 2017, ch. 19, § 15, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 19, § 16, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 505, § 1, effective April 12, 2019.

Note.

Section 3 of chapter 505, S.L. 2019 provides, “

EFFECTIVE DATE.

This Act is effective for allocations made by the state treasurer beginning on the first day of the month following the month in which this Act is filed with the secretary of state.”

Cross-References.

Money received for southwest pipeline project capital costs deposited in resources trust fund, see N.D.C.C. § 61-24.3-18.

57-51.1-07.1.
Resources trust fund — Procedure for review of applications for financial assistance for water-related projects.

A political subdivision or rural water system seeking loans, grants, or other financial assistance by legislative appropriation from the resources trust fund for a water-related project or study must submit the proposed water-related project or study to the state water commission for review. The commission may require the political subdivision or rural water system to supply information as it considers necessary to review the request. After consideration and review of the proposed water-related project or study, the state water commission may conduct or it may require the project sponsor to conduct a preliminary study for the proposed project or study. The preliminary study must be conducted in accordance with criteria established pursuant to subsection 3.

Every legislative bill appropriating moneys from the resources trust fund pursuant to subsection 1 must be accompanied by a state water commission report, which must include:

A summary of the engineering feasibility study of the proposed water project.

Statements concerning the proposed water project as it relates to the comprehensive state water plan of the state water commission.

The need for the proposed water project, including any alternative projects which would satisfy such need.

The availability of other sources of funding or financial assistance for such water project.

A recommendation as to whether or not the proposed water project should receive financial assistance through legislative appropriation from the resources trust fund.

Other items as deemed necessary or appropriate by the state water commission.

The state water commission shall adopt rules for governing the review and recommendation of proposed water projects for which financial assistance by legislative appropriation from the resources trust fund is being sought under this section. The rules must consider project revenues, local cost sharing, and ability to pay. The rules may provide for repayment of a portion of funds allocated from the resources trust fund.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 652, § 1; 2013, ch. 474, § 1.

57-51.1-07.2.
Permanent oil tax trust fund — Deposits — Interest — Adjustment of distribution formula. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 483, § 11.

57-51.1-07.3.
Oil and gas research fund — Deposits — Continuing appropriation.

There is established a special fund in the state treasury to be known as the oil and gas research fund. Before depositing oil and gas gross production tax and oil extraction tax revenues under section 57-51.1-07.5, two percent of the revenues must be deposited monthly into the oil and gas research fund, up to ten million dollars per biennium. All moneys deposited in the oil and gas research fund and interest on all such moneys are appropriated as a continuing appropriation to the council to be used for purposes stated in chapter 54-17.6.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 472, § 2; 2007, ch. 464, § 6; 2009, ch. 580, § 1; 2009, ch. 581, § 1; 2011, ch. 483, § 8; 2013, ch. 45, § 30; 2015, ch. 467, § 3, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 402, § 1, effective April 28, 2017; 2019, ch. 504, § 4, eff for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2019.

57-51.1-07.4.
Separate allocation of state share of collections from reservation development. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 483, § 11.

57-51.1-07.5.
State share of oil and gas taxes — Deposits.

From the revenues designated for deposit in the state general fund under chapters 57-51 and 57-51.1, the state treasurer shall deposit the revenues received each biennium in the following order:

The first two hundred million dollars into the state general fund;

The next two hundred million dollars into the tax relief fund;

The next seventy-five million dollars into the budget stabilization fund, but not in an amount that would bring the balance in the fund to more than the limit in section 54-27.2-01;

The next two hundred million dollars into the state general fund;

The next ten million dollars into the lignite research fund;

The next twenty million dollars into the state disaster relief fund, but not in an amount that would bring the unobligated balance in the fund to more than twenty million dollars;

The next fifty-nine million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, or the amount necessary to provide for twice the amount of the distributions under subsection 2 of section 57-51.1-07.7, into the funds designated for infrastructure development in non-oil-producing counties under sections 57-51.1-07.7 and 57-51.1-07.8 with fifty percent deposited into the municipal infrastructure fund and fifty percent deposited into the county and township infrastructure fund;

The next one hundred seventy million two hundred fifty thousand dollars or the amount necessary to provide a total of two hundred thirty million dollars into the funds designated for infrastructure development in non-oil-producing counties under sections 57-51.1-07.7 and 57-51.1-07.8 with fifty percent deposited into the municipal infrastructure fund and fifty percent deposited into the county and township infrastructure fund;

The next twenty million dollars into the airport infrastructure fund; and

Any additional revenues into the strategic investment and improvements fund.

The next four hundred million dollars into the strategic investment and improvements fund;

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 483, § 9; 2013, ch. 13, § 40; 2015, ch. 467, § 4, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 402, § 2, effective April 28, 2017; 2019, ch. 41, § 9, eff for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2019; 2019, ch. 504, § 5, eff for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2019; 2021, ch. 15, § 35, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 482, § 1, eff for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2021.

Note.

Section 57-51.1-07.5 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly.

Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 482, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2249; and Section 35 of Chapter 15, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1015.

S.L. 2013, chapter 13, § 40, codified as N.D.C.C. § 15.1-27-45, provides for the substitution of “the property tax relief fund” for “the property tax relief sustainability fund” wherever it appears in the North Dakota Century Code.

Section 57-51.1-07.5 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 5 of Chapter 504, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1066; and Section 9 of Chapter 41, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2016.

57-51.1-07.6.
Political subdivision allocation fund. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2015, ch. 467, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 38, § 18, effective July 1, 2017; repealed by 2017, ch. 38, § 19, effective September 1, 2017.